District of Columbia statutes.
1-612.34

Leave contributions.

(a)

A potential leave contributor may, by written application to the agency head or designee, request that a specified number of hours be transferred from the annual or universal leave account of the employee to the annual or universal leave account of a potential recipient employee.

(b)

A leave contributor shall not contribute more than 1/2 of the amount of annual or universal leave that the leave contributor would be entitled to accrue during the leave year; provided, that a leave contributor may contribute restored leave without limitation.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1234
as added Feb. 6, 2004, D.C. Law 15-68, § 2, 50 DCR 9819